Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2521
Continuing competency requirements; waiver.

The department, with the recommendation of the board, may waive continuing competency requirements, in part or in total, for any two-year licensing period when a licensee submits documentation that circumstances beyond his or her control prevented completion of such requirements as provided in section 38-146. In addition to circumstances determined by the department to be beyond the licensee's control pursuant to such section, such circumstances shall include situations in which:

(1) The licensee holds a Nebraska license but does not reside or practice in Nebraska;

(2) The licensee has submitted proof that he or she was suffering from a serious or disabling illness or physical disability which prevented completion of the required continuing competency activities during the twenty-four months preceding the license renewal date; and

(3) The licensee has successfully completed two or more semester hours of formal credit instruction biennially offered by a school or college approved by the board which contributes to meeting the requirements of an advanced degree in a postgraduate program relating to occupational therapy.

Laws 1984, LB 761, § 41;

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 77;

Laws 2001, LB 346, § 2;

Laws 2002, LB 1021, § 96;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 142;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 129;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-6113;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 861;

Laws 2018, LB1034, § 42.